Utah statutes.
53A-11-1402.   Educational records and enrollment -- Military children.
(1) (a)  If the parent or legal guardian of a military child requests an
official education record and the school is unable to release the official
education record, the school shall provide the parent or guardian of the
military child with an unofficial education record.
(b)  If a school requires an official education record in order to enroll a
student, the school shall enroll and appropriately place a military child
based on information in an unofficial record pending validation by an official
record.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection 53A-11-504(1), a school that enrolls a
military child shall request a certified copy of a military child's official
education record, directly from the military child's previous school,
simultaneous with enrolling the military child.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection 53A-11-504(2)(a), if a school receives a
request to forward a certified copy of a military child's official education
record, the school shall comply within 10 days of the request.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection 53A-3-402(6), a local school board shall
enroll a military child who is not five years of age before September 2 of the
year in which admission is sought if the military child was previously
enrolled and attended a public school in kindergarten or a higher grade as a
resident in another state.
(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection 53A-11-302(2), a military child who at the
time of school enrollment has not been completely immunized against each
specified disease may attend under a conditional enrollment, and shall be
given 30 days from the day of enrollment to obtain:
(i)  each specified vaccine if the specified vaccine only requires one dose;
and
(ii)  at least the first dose of a specified vaccine, if the specified vaccine
is a series of vaccines.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(a), a military child is subject to
rules developed by the Utah Health Department in accordance with Section
53A-11-302.
